South Dakota, session 2026, HB1090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 3-4:
The governor's office shall publish, in the next regularly scheduled issue of the
South Dakota Register, notice of any appointment or reappointment of a nominee to, or
the filling of any vacancy of, a board, commission, council, or any other state entity over
which the Governor has a constitutional or statutory power of appointment.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.